Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3207
Uniformity of application and construction.

The Uniform Conflict of Laws Limitations Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the Uniform Conflict of Laws Limitations Act among states enacting it.

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 7.